Tennessee, session 114, SB0710.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-16-404, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting:
(b) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor. All violations must
be punished by at least thirty (30) hours of community service work to be determined by
the court, in addition to any other punishment authorized under § 40-35-111.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0710
002583
- 1 -